Hawaii statutes.
[§453-54] Limitation of liability.
A health professional who provides expedited partner therapy as authorized
under section 453-52, a person licensed or otherwise authorized by law to
practice medicine or surgery under this chapter, an advanced practice
registered nurse with prescriptive authority under chapter 457, or a pharmacist
who is licensed or otherwise authorized to engage in the practice of pharmacy
under chapter 461, who reasonably and in good faith renders the expedited
partner therapy in accordance with this section and the rules and regulations
adopted by the director of commerce and consumer affairs, shall not be subject
to civil or criminal liability or be deemed to have engaged in unprofessional
conduct for rendering that therapy. [L 2013, c 250, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next